Utah statutes.
26-1-18.   Authority of department generally.

The department is the health, health planning, and medical assistance authority of the state and is the sole state agency for administration of federally assisted state programs or plans for public health, health planning, maternal and child health, services for children with a disability, and medical assistance.



Amended by Chapter 366, 2011 General Session

